Washington statutes.
RCW 18.280.040

Home inspector advisory licensing board.

(1) The state home inspector advisory licensing board is created. The board consists of seven members appointed by the director, who shall advise the director concerning the administration of this chapter. Of the appointments to this board, six must be actively engaged as home inspectors immediately prior to their appointment to the board, and one must be currently teaching in a home inspector education program. Insofar as possible, the composition of the appointed home inspector members of the board must be generally representative of the geographic distribution of home inspectors licensed under this chapter. No more than two board members may be members of a particular national home inspector association or organization.

(2) A home inspector must have the following qualifications to be appointed to the board:

(a) Actively engaged as a home inspector in the state of Washington for five years;

(b) Licensed as a home inspector under this chapter, except for initial appointments; and

(c) Performed a minimum of five hundred home inspections in the state of Washington.

(3) Members of the board are appointed for three-year terms. Terms must be staggered so that not more than two appointments are scheduled to be made in any calendar year. Members hold office until the expiration of the terms for which they were appointed. The director may remove a board member for just cause. The director may appoint a new member to fill a vacancy on the board for the remainder of the unexpired term. All board members are limited to two consecutive terms.

(4) Each board member is entitled to compensation for each day spent conducting official business and to reimbursement for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.240, 43.03.050, and 43.03.060.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 21 s 43; 2008 c 119 s 4.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 21: See note following RCW 72.23.025.